Arkansas, session 2025, HB1546.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION - MEDICAL CONTRACTS. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Corrections, to be payable from the paying
account as determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for costs
associated with medical contracts of the Department of Corrections - Shared
Services Paying Account which shall be supplemental and in addition to those
funds appropriated in Section 2 of Act 49 of 2024, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2024-2025
(01) MEDICAL CONTRACTS $19,500,000

SECTION 2. APPROPRIATION - COUNTY JAIL REIMBURSEMENT. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Corrections, to be payable from the County
*DJC012*
02/20/2025 11:10:31 AM DJC012

HB1546
Jail Reimbursement Fund, for reimbursements to counties housing state inmates
of the Department of Corrections - County Jail Reimbursement which shall be
supplemental and in addition to those funds appropriated in Section 3 of Act
49 of 2024, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2024-2025
(01) REFUNDS/REIMBURSEMENT $6,500,000

SECTION 3. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. FUND
TRANSFER. Immediately upon the effective date of this act, the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State shall transfer on his or her books and those of the
State Treasurer and the Auditor of the State the sum of nineteen million five
hundred thousand dollars ($19,500,000) from the General Revenue Allotment
Reserve Fund to the paying account as determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer
of the State to provide funds for costs associated with medical contracts of
the Department of Corrections.

SECTION 4. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. FUND
TRANSFER. Immediately upon the effective date of this act, the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State shall transfer on his or her books and those of the
State Treasurer and the Auditor of the State the sum of six million five
hundred thousand dollars ($6,500,000) from the General Revenue Allotment
Reserve Fund to the County Jail Reimbursement Fund to provide funds for
reimbursement to counties housing state inmates of the Department of
Corrections.

SECTION 5. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors, and other fiscal
control laws of this State, where applicable, and regulations promulgated by
02/20/2025 11:10:31 AM DJC012

HB1546
the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized by law, shall be
strictly complied with in disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 6. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 7. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the General
Assembly, that funds provided by the General Assembly for the operations of
the Department of Corrections are, due to unforeseen circumstances,
insufficient for the Department of Corrections to continue to provide
essential governmental services; that the provisions of this act will provide
the necessary monies for the Department of Corrections to continue such
services; and that a delay in the effective date of this Act could work
irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential
governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist
and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after the
date of its passage and approval.
If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall
become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the
Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the
veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house
overrides the veto.







02/20/2025 11:10:31 AM DJC012